src/main/resources/hyph/it.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<hyphenation-info>

    <!-- hyph-it.tex -->

    <!-- Italian hyphenation patterns -->

    <!-- This file is part of the hyph-utf8 package. -->
    <!-- For more unformation see -->

    <!-- http://tug.org/tex-hyphen -->

    <!-- ‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐‐ -->

    <!-- Copyright 2008-2011 Claudio Beccari -->

    <!-- This work may be distributed and/or modified under the -->
    <!-- conditions of the LaTeX Project Public License, either -->
    <!-- version 1.3 of this license or (at your option) any later -->
    <!-- version. The latest version of this license is in -->
    <!-- http://www.latex-project.org/lppl.txt -->
    <!-- and version 1.3 or later is part of all distributions -->
    <!-- of LaTeX version 2003/12/01 or later. -->

    <!-- This work has the LPPL maintenance status "maintained". -->

    <!-- This Current Maintainer of this work is Claudio Beccari -->
    <!-- e-mail:  claudio dot beccari at gmail dot com -->

    <!-- This work consists of the single file hyph-it.tex. -->

    <!-- \versionnumber{4.9}   \versiondate{2014/04/22} -->

    <!-- These hyphenation patterns for the Italian language are supposed to comply -->
    <!-- with the Recommendation UNI 6461 on hyphenation issued by the Italian -->
    <!-- Standards Institution (Ente Nazionale di Unificazione UNI).  No guarantee -->
    <!-- or declaration of fitness to any particular purpose is given and any -->
    <!-- liability is disclaimed. -->

    <!-- ChangeLog: -->
    <!-- - 2014-04-22 - Add few patterns involving `h' -->
    <!-- - 2011-08-16 - Change the licence from GNU LGPL into LPPL v1.3. -->
    <!-- - 2010-05-24 - Fix for Italian patterns for proper hyphenation of -ich and Ljubljana. -->
    <!-- - 2008-06-09 - Import of original ithyph.tex into hyph-utf8 package. -->
    <!-- - 2008-03-08 - (last change in ithyph.tex) -->


    <hyphen-min before="2" after="2"/>

    <exceptions>
    </exceptions>

    <patterns>
        .a3p2n
        .anti1
        .anti3m2n
        .bio1
        .ca4p3s
        .circu2m1
        .contro1
        .di2s3cine
        .e2x1eu
        .fran2k3
        .free3
        .li3p2sa
        .narco1
        .opto1
        .orto3p2
        .para1
        .ph2l
        .ph2r
        .poli3p2
        .pre1
        .p2s
        .re1i2scr
        .sha2re3
        .tran2s3c
        .tran2s3d
        .tran2s3l
        .tran2s3n
        .tran2s3p
        .tran2s3r
        .tran2s3t
        .su2b3lu
        .su2b3r
        .wa2g3n
        .wel2t1
        2’2
        2’2
        a1ia
        a1ie
        a1io
        a1iu
        a1uo
        a1ya
        2at.
        e1iu
        e2w
        o1ia
        o1ie
        o1io
        o1iu
        1b
        2bb
        2bc
        2bd
        2bf
        2bm
        2bn
        2bp
        2bs
        2bt
        2bv
        b2l
        b2r
        2b.
        2b’
        2b’
        1c
        2cb
        2cc
        2cd
        2cf
        2ck
        2cm
        2cn
        2cq
        2cs
        2ct
        2cz
        2chh
        c2h
        2ch.
        2ch’.
        2ch’.
        2ch’’.
        2ch’’.
        2chb
        ch2r
        2chn
        c2l
        c2r
        2c.
        2c’
        2c’
        .c2
        1d
        2db
        2dd
        2dg
        2dl
        2dm
        2dn
        2dp
        d2r
        2ds
        2dt
        2dv
        2dw
        2d.
        2d’
        2d’
        .d2
        1f
        2fb
        2fg
        2ff
        2fn
        f2l
        f2r
        2fs
        2ft
        2f.
        2f’
        2f’
        1g
        2gb
        2gd
        2gf
        2gg
        g2h
        g2l
        2gm
        g2n
        2gp
        g2r
        2gs
        2gt
        2gv
        2gw
        2gz
        2gh2t
        2g.
        2g’
        2g’
        .h2
        1h
        2hb
        2hd
        2hh
        hi3p2n
        h2l
        2hm
        2hn
        2hr
        2hv
        2h.
        2h’
        2h’
        .j2
        1j
        2j.
        2j’
        2j’
        .k2
        1k
        2kg
        2kf
        k2h
        2kk
        k2l
        2km
        k2r
        2ks
        2kt
        2k.
        2k’
        2k’
        1l
        2lb
        2lc
        2ld
        2l3f2
        2lg
        l2h
        l2j
        2lk
        2ll
        2lm
        2ln
        2lp
        2lq
        2lr
        2ls
        2lt
        2lv
        2lw
        2lz
        2l.
        2l’.
        2l’.
        2l’’
        2l’’
        1m
        2mb
        2mc
        2mf
        2ml
        2mm
        2mn
        2mp
        2mq
        2mr
        2ms
        2mt
        2mv
        2mw
        2m.
        2m’
        2m’
        1n
        2nb
        2nc
        2nd
        2nf
        2ng
        2nk
        2nl
        2nm
        2nn
        2np
        2nq
        2nr
        2ns
        n2s3fer
        2nt
        2nv
        2nz
        n2g3n
        2nheit
        2n.
        2n’
        2n’
        1p
        2pd
        p2h
        p2l
        2pn
        3p2ne
        2pp
        p2r
        2ps
        3p2sic
        2pt
        2pz
        2p.
        2p’
        2p’
        1q
        2qq
        2q.
        2q’
        2q’
        1r
        2rb
        2rc
        2rd
        2rf
        r2h
        2rg
        2rk
        2rl
        2rm
        2rn
        2rp
        2rq
        2rr
        2rs
        2rt
        r2t2s3
        2rv
        2rx
        2rw
        2rz
        2r.
        2r’
        2r’
        1s2
        2shm
        2sh.
        2sh’
        2sh’
        2s3s
        s4s3m
        2s3p2n
        2stb
        2stc
        2std
        2stf
        2stg
        2stm
        2stn
        2stp
        2sts
        2stt
        2stv
        2sz
        4s.
        4s’.
        4s’.
        4s’’
        4s’’
        .t2
        1t
        2tb
        2tc
        2td
        2tf
        2tg
        t2h
        2th.
        t2l
        2tm
        2tn
        2tp
        t2r
        t2s
        3t2sch
        2tt
        t2t3s
        2tv
        2tw
        t2z
        2tzk
        tz2s
        2t.
        2t’.
        2t’.
        2t’’
        2t’’
        1v
        2vc
        v2l
        v2r
        2vv
        2v.
        2v’.
        2v’.
        2v’’
        2v’’
        1w
        w2h
        wa2r
        2w1y
        2w.
        2w’
        2w’
        1x
        2xb
        2xc
        2xf
        2xh
        2xm
        2xp
        2xt
        2xw
        2x.
        2x’
        2x’
        y1ou
        y1i
        1z
        2zb
        2zd
        2zl
        2zn
        2zp
        2zt
        2zs
        2zv
        2zz
        2z.
        2z’.
        2z’.
        2z’’
        2z’’
        .z2
    </patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
